District of Columbia statutes.
16-4603.06

Enforcement of registered determination.

(a)

A court of the District may grant any relief normally available under the law of the District to enforce a registered child-custody determination made by a court of another state.

(b)

A court of the District shall recognize and enforce, but may not modify, except in accordance with subchapter II of this chapter, a registered child-custody determination of a court of another state.

History

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-293, § 2(d), 48 DCR 2214

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 306 of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act (1997 Act).